Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4980.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5b. (1) To obtain a license to carry a concealed pistol, an individual shall apply to the a county clerk in the any county in which the individual resides. this state. The applicant shall file the application with the county clerk in the county in which the applicant resides during the county clerk's normal business hours. The application must be on a form provided by the director of the department of state police and allow the applicant to designate whether the applicant seeks an emergency license. The applicant shall sign the application under oath. The county clerk or the county clerk's representative shall administer the oath. An application under this subsection is not considered complete until an applicant submits all of the required information and fees and has fingerprints taken under subsection (9). An application under this subsection is considered withdrawn if an applicant does not have fingerprints taken under subsection (9) within 45 days after the date an application is filed under this subsection. A completed application and all receipts issued under this section expire 1 year after the date of application. The county clerk shall issue the applicant a receipt for the applicant's application at the time the application is submitted containing the name of the applicant, the applicant's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number, the date and time the receipt is issued, the amount paid, the name of the county in which the receipt is issued, an impression of the county seal, and the statement, "This receipt was issued for the purpose of applying for a concealed pistol license and for obtaining fingerprints related to that application. This receipt does not authorize an individual to carry a concealed pistol in this state.". The application must contain all of the following: (a) The applicant's legal name, date of birth, the address of the applicant's primary residence, and the applicant's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number. (b) A statement by the applicant that the applicant meets the criteria for a license under this act to carry a concealed pistol. (c) A statement by the applicant authorizing the department of state police to access any record needed to perform the verification in subsection (6). (d) A statement by the applicant regarding whether the applicant has a history of mental illness that would disqualify the applicant under subsection (7)(j) to (l) from receiving a license to carry a concealed pistol. (e) A statement by the applicant regarding whether the applicant has ever been convicted in this state or elsewhere for any of the following: (i) Any felony. (ii) A misdemeanor listed under subsection (7)(h) if the applicant was convicted of that misdemeanor in the 8 years immediately preceding the date of the application, or a misdemeanor listed under subsection (7)(i) if the applicant was convicted of that misdemeanor in the 3 years immediately preceding the date of the application. (f) A statement by the applicant whether the applicant has been dishonorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States. (g) If an applicant does not have a digitized photograph on file with the secretary of state, a passport-quality photograph of the applicant provided by the applicant at the time of application. (h) A certificate stating that the applicant has completed the training course prescribed by this act. (2) The county clerk shall not require the applicant to submit any additional forms, documents, letters, or other evidence of eligibility for obtaining a license to carry a concealed pistol except as set forth in subsection (1) or as otherwise provided for in this act. The application form must contain a conspicuous warning that the application is executed under oath and that intentionally making a material false statement on the application is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. (3) An individual who intentionally makes a material false statement on an application under subsection (1) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. (4) The county clerk shall retain a copy of each application for a license to carry a concealed pistol as an official record. One year after the expiration of a concealed pistol license, the county clerk may destroy the record and a name index of the record must be maintained in the database created in section 5e. (5) Each applicant shall pay a nonrefundable application and licensing fee of $100.00 by any method of payment accepted by that county for payments of other fees and penalties. Except as provided in subsection (9), no other charge, fee, cost, or assessment, including any local charge, fee, cost, or assessment, is required of the applicant except as specifically authorized in this act. The applicant shall pay the application and licensing fee to the county. The county treasurer shall deposit $26.00 of each application and licensing fee collected under this section in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. The county treasurer shall forward the balance remaining to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the balance of the fee in the general fund to the credit of the department of state police. The department of state police shall use the money received under this act to process the fingerprints and to reimburse the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the costs associated with processing fingerprints submitted under this act. The balance of the money received under this act must be credited to the department of state police. (6) The department of state police shall verify the requirements of subsection (7)(d), (e), (f), (h), (i), (j), (k), and (m) through the law enforcement information network and the national instant criminal background check system and shall report to the county clerk all statutory disqualifications, if any, under this act that apply to an applicant. (7) The county clerk shall issue and shall send by first-class mail a license to an applicant to carry a concealed pistol within the period required under this act if the county clerk determines that all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The applicant is 21 years of age or older. (b) The applicant is a citizen of the United States or is an alien lawfully admitted into the United States, is a legal resident of this state, and has resided in this state for not less than the 6 months immediately preceding the date of application. The county clerk shall waive the 6-month residency requirement for an emergency license under section 5a(4) if the applicant is a petitioner for a personal protection order issued under section 2950 or 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a, or if the county sheriff determines that there is clear and convincing evidence to believe that the safety of the applicant or the safety of a member of the applicant's family or household is endangered by the applicant's inability to immediately obtain a license to carry a concealed pistol. If the applicant holds a valid concealed pistol license issued by another state at the time the applicant's residency in this state is established, the county clerk shall waive the 6-month residency requirement and the applicant may apply for a concealed pistol license at the time the applicant's residency in this state is established. For the purposes of this section, an individual is considered a legal resident of this state if any of the following apply: (i) The individual has a valid, lawfully obtained driver license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300. (ii) The individual is lawfully registered to vote in this state. (iii) The individual is on active duty status with the Armed Forces of the United States and is stationed outside of this state, but the individual's home of record is in this state. (iv) The individual is on active duty status with the Armed Forces of the United States and is permanently stationed in this state, but the individual's home of record is in another state. (c) The applicant has knowledge and has had training in the safe use and handling of a pistol by the successful completion of a pistol safety training course or class that meets the requirements of section 5j. (d) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant is not the subject of an order or disposition under any of the following: (i) Section 464a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1464a. (ii) Section 5107 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5107. (iii) Sections 2950 and 2950a of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2950 and 600.2950a. (iv) Section 6b of chapter V of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 765.6b, if the order has a condition imposed under section 6b(3) of chapter V of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 765.6b. (v) Section 16b of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.16b. (vi) The extreme risk protection order act. (e) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant is not prohibited from possessing, using, transporting, selling, purchasing, carrying, shipping, receiving, or distributing a firearm under section 224f of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224f. (f) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant has never been convicted of a felony in this state or elsewhere, and a felony charge against the applicant is not pending in this state or elsewhere at the time the applicant applies for a license described in this section. (g) The applicant has not been dishonorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States. (h) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant has not been convicted of a misdemeanor violation of any of the following in the 8 years immediately preceding the date of application and a charge for a misdemeanor violation of any of the following is not pending against the applicant in this state or elsewhere at the time the applicant applies for a license described in this section: (i) Section 617a (failing to stop when involved in a personal injury accident), section 625 as punishable under subsection (9)(b) of that section (operating while intoxicated, second offense), section 625m as punishable under subsection (4) of that section (operating a commercial vehicle with alcohol content, second offense), section 626 (reckless driving), or a violation of section 904(1) (operating while license suspended or revoked, second or subsequent offense) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.617a, 257.625, 257.625m, 257.626, and 257.904. (ii) Section 185(7) of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.185 (operating aircraft while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance with prior conviction). (iii) Section 29 of the weights and measures act, 1964 PA 283, MCL 290.629 (hindering or obstructing certain persons performing official weights and measures duties). (iv) Section 10 of the motor fuels quality act, 1984 PA 44, MCL 290.650 (hindering, obstructing, assaulting, or committing bodily injury upon director or authorized representative). (v) Section 80176 as punishable under section 80177(1)(b) (operating vessel under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, second offense), section 81134 as punishable under subsection (8)(b) of that section (operating ORV under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, second or subsequent offense), or section 82127 as punishable under section 82128(1)(b) (operating snowmobile under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, second offense) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80176, 324.80177, 324.81134, 324.82127, and 324.82128. (vi) Section 7403 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7403 (possession of controlled substance, controlled substance analogue, or prescription form). (vii) Section 353 of the railroad code of 1993, 1993 PA 354, MCL 462.353, punishable under subsection (4) of that section (operating locomotive under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance, or while visibly impaired, second offense). (viii) Section 7 of 1978 PA 33, MCL 722.677 (displaying sexually explicit matter to minors). (ix) Section 81 (assault or domestic assault), section 81a(1) or (2) (aggravated assault or aggravated domestic assault), section 115 (breaking and entering or entering without breaking), section 136b(7) (fourth degree child abuse), section 145n (vulnerable adult abuse), section 157b(3)(b) (solicitation to commit a felony), section 215 (impersonating peace officer or medical examiner), section 223 (illegal sale of a firearm or ammunition), section 224d (illegal use or sale of a self-defense spray), section 227c (improper transportation of a loaded firearm), section 229 (accepting a pistol in pawn), section 232a (improperly obtaining a pistol, making a false statement on an application to purchase a pistol, or using false identification to purchase a pistol), section 233 (intentionally aiming a firearm without malice), section 234 (intentionally discharging a firearm aimed without malice), section 234d (possessing a firearm on prohibited premises), section 234e (brandishing a firearm in public), section 234f (possession of a firearm by an individual less than 18 years of age), section 235 (intentionally discharging a firearm aimed without malice causing injury), section 235a (parent of a minor who possessed a firearm in a weapon free school zone), section 236 (setting a spring gun or other device), section 237 (possessing a firearm while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance), section 237a (weapon free school zone violation), section 335a (indecent exposure), section 411h (stalking), or section 520e (fourth degree criminal sexual conduct) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81, 750.81a, 750.115, 750.136b, 750.145n, 750.157b, 750.215, 750.223, 750.224d, 750.227c, 750.229, 750.232a, 750.233, 750.234, 750.234d, 750.234e, 750.234f, 750.235, 750.235a, 750.236, 750.237, 750.237a, 750.335a, 750.411h, and 750.520e. (x) Section 1 (reckless, careless, or negligent use of a firearm resulting in injury or death), section 2 (careless, reckless, or negligent use of a firearm resulting in property damage), or section 3a (reckless discharge of a firearm) of 1952 PA 45, MCL 752.861, 752.862, and 752.863a. (xi) A violation of a law of the United States, another state, or a local unit of government of this state or another state substantially corresponding to a violation described in subparagraphs (i) to (x). (i) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant has not been convicted of a misdemeanor violation of any of the following in the 3 years immediately preceding the date of application unless the misdemeanor violation is listed under subdivision (h) and a charge for a misdemeanor violation of any of the following is not pending against the applicant in this state or elsewhere at the time the applicant applies for a license described in this section: (i) Section 625 (operating under the influence), section 625a (refusal of commercial vehicle operator to submit to a chemical test), section 625k (ignition interlock device reporting violation), section 625l (circumventing an ignition interlock device), or section 625m punishable under subsection (3) of that section (operating a commercial vehicle with alcohol content) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.625, 257.625a, 257.625k, 257.625l, and 257.625m. (ii) Section 185 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.185 (operating aircraft under the influence). (iii) Section 81134 (operating ORV under the influence or operating ORV while visibly impaired), or section 82127 (operating a snowmobile under the influence) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81134 and 324.82127. (iv) Part 74 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401 to 333.7461 (controlled substance violation). (v) Section 353 of the railroad code of 1993, 1993 PA 354, MCL 462.353, punishable under subsection (3) of that section (operating locomotive under the influence). (vi) Section 167 (disorderly person), section 174 (embezzlement), section 218 (false pretenses with intent to defraud), section 356 (larceny), section 356d (second degree retail fraud), section 359 (larceny from a vacant building or structure), section 362 (larceny by conversion), section 362a (larceny ? defrauding lessor), section 377a (malicious destruction of property), section 380 (malicious destruction of real property), section 535 (receiving or concealing stolen property), or section 540e (malicious use of telecommunications service or device) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.167, 750.174, 750.218, 750.356, 750.356d, 750.359, 750.362, 750.362a, 750.377a, 750.380, 750.535, and 750.540e. (vii) A violation of a law of the United States, another state, or a local unit of government of this state or another state substantially corresponding to a violation described in subparagraphs (i) to (vi). (j) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant has not been found guilty but mentally ill of any crime and has not offered a plea of not guilty of, or been acquitted of, any crime by reason of insanity. (k) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant is not currently and has never been subject to an order of involuntary commitment in an inpatient or outpatient setting due to mental illness. (l) The applicant has filed a statement under subsection (1)(d) that the applicant does not have a diagnosis of mental illness that includes an assessment that the individual presents a danger to the applicant or to another at the time the application is made, regardless of whether the applicant is receiving treatment for that illness. (m) Based solely on the report received from the department of state police under subsection (6), the applicant is not under a court order of legal incapacity in this state or elsewhere. (n) The applicant has a valid state-issued driver license or personal identification card. (8) Upon On entry of a court order or conviction of 1 of the enumerated prohibitions for using, transporting, selling, purchasing, carrying, shipping, receiving, or distributing a firearm in this section the department of state police shall immediately enter the order or conviction into the law enforcement information network. For purposes of this act, information of the court order or conviction must not be removed from the law enforcement information network, but may be moved to a separate file intended for the use of the department of state police, the courts, and other government entities as necessary and exclusively to determine eligibility to be licensed under this act. (9) An individual, after submitting an application and paying the fee prescribed under subsection (5), shall request that classifiable fingerprints be taken by a county clerk, the department of state police, a county sheriff, a local police agency, or other entity, if the county clerk, department of state police, county sheriff, local police agency, or other entity provides fingerprinting capability for the purposes of this act. An individual who has had classifiable fingerprints taken under section 5a(4) does not need additional fingerprints taken under this subsection. If the individual requests that classifiable fingerprints be taken by the county clerk, department of state police, county sheriff, a local police agency, or other entity, the individual shall also pay a fee of $15.00 by any method of payment accepted for payments of other fees and penalties. A county clerk shall deposit any fee it accepts under this subsection in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. The county clerk, department of state police, county sheriff, local police agency, or other entity shall take the fingerprints within 5 business days after the request. County clerks, the department of state police, county sheriffs, local police agencies, and other entities shall provide reasonable access to fingerprinting services during normal business hours as is necessary to comply with the requirements of this act if the county clerk, department of state police, county sheriff, local police agency, or other entity provides fingerprinting capability for the purposes of this act. The entity providing fingerprinting services shall issue the individual a receipt at the time the individual's fingerprints are taken. The county clerk, department of state police, county sheriff, local police agency, or other entity shall not provide a receipt under this subsection unless the individual requesting the fingerprints provides an application receipt received under subsection (1). A receipt under this subsection must contain all of the following: (a) The name of the individual. (b) The date and time the receipt is issued. (c) The amount paid. (d) The name of the entity providing the fingerprint services. (e) The individual's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number. (f) The statement "This receipt was issued for the purpose of applying for a concealed pistol license. As provided in section 5b of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425b, if a license or notice of statutory disqualification is not issued within 45 days after the date this receipt was issued, this receipt shall serve as a concealed pistol license for the individual named in the receipt when carried with an official state-issued driver license or personal identification card. The receipt is valid as a license until a license or notice of statutory disqualification is issued by the county clerk. This receipt does not exempt the individual named in the receipt from complying with all applicable laws for the purchase of firearms.". (10) The fingerprints must be taken, under subsection (9), in a manner prescribed by the department of state police. The county clerk, county sheriff, local police agency, or other entity shall immediately forward the fingerprints taken by that entity to the department of state police for comparison with fingerprints already on file with the department of state police. The department of state police shall immediately forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Within 5 business days after completing the verification under subsection (6), the department shall send the county clerk a list of an individual's statutory disqualifications under this act. Except as provided in section 5a(4), the county clerk shall not issue a concealed pistol license until the county clerk receives the report of statutory disqualifications prescribed in this subsection. If an individual's fingerprints are not classifiable, the department of state police shall, at no charge, take the individual's fingerprints again or provide for the comparisons under this subsection to be conducted through alternative means. The county clerk shall not issue a notice of statutory disqualification because an individual's fingerprints are not classifiable by the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (11) The county clerk shall send by first-class mail a notice of statutory disqualification for a license under this act to an individual if the individual is not qualified under subsection (7) to receive that license. (12) A license to carry a concealed pistol that is issued based upon an application that contains a material false statement is void from the date the license is issued. (13) Subject to subsection (10), the department of state police shall complete the verification required under subsection (6) and the county clerk shall issue a license or a notice of statutory disqualification not later than 45 days after the date the individual has classifiable fingerprints taken under subsection (9). The county clerk shall include an indication on the license if an individual is exempt from the prohibitions against carrying a concealed pistol on premises described in section 5o if the applicant provides acceptable proof that the applicant qualifies for that exemption. If the county clerk receives notice from a county sheriff or chief law enforcement officer that a licensee is no longer a member of a sheriff's posse, an auxiliary officer, or a reserve officer, the county clerk shall notify the licensee that the licensee shall surrender the concealed pistol license indicating that the individual is exempt from the prohibitions against carrying a concealed pistol on premises described in section 5o. The licensee shall, not later than 30 days after receiving notice from the county clerk, surrender the license indicating that the individual is exempt from the prohibitions against carrying a concealed pistol on premises described in section 5o and obtain a replacement license after paying the fee required under subsection (15). If the county clerk issues a notice of statutory disqualification, the county clerk shall, not later than 5 business days after that notice, do all of the following: (a) Inform the individual in writing of the reasons for the denial or disqualification. Information under this subdivision must include all of the following: (i) A statement of each statutory disqualification identified. (ii) The source of the record for each statutory disqualification identified. (iii) The contact information for the source of the record for each statutory disqualification identified. (b) Inform the individual in writing of the individual's right to appeal the denial or notice of statutory disqualification to the circuit court as provided in section 5d. (c) Inform the individual that the individual should contact the source of the record for any statutory disqualification to correct any errors in the record resulting in the statutory disqualification. (14) If a license or notice of statutory disqualification is not issued under subsection (13) within 45 days after the date the individual has classifiable fingerprints taken under subsection (9), the receipt issued under subsection (9) serves as a concealed pistol license for purposes of this act when carried with a state-issued driver license or personal identification card and is valid until a license or notice of statutory disqualification is issued by the county clerk. (15) If an individual licensed under this act to carry a concealed pistol moves to a different county within this state, the individual's license remains valid until it expires or is otherwise suspended or revoked under this act. An individual may notify a county clerk that the individual has moved to a different address within this state for the purpose of receiving the notice under section 5l(1). A license to carry a concealed pistol that is lost, stolen, defaced, or replaced for any other reason may be replaced by the issuing county clerk for a replacement fee of $10.00. A county clerk shall deposit a replacement fee under this subsection in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. (16) If a license issued under this act is suspended or revoked, the license is forfeited and the individual shall return the license to the county clerk forthwith by mail or in person. The county clerk shall retain a suspended or revoked license as an official record 1 year after the expiration of the license, unless the license is reinstated or a new license is issued. The county clerk shall notify the department of state police if a license is suspended or revoked. The department of state police shall enter that suspension or revocation into the law enforcement information network. An individual who fails to return a license as required under this subsection after the individual was notified that the individual's license was suspended or revoked is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (17) An applicant or an individual licensed under this act to carry a concealed pistol may be furnished a copy of the individual's application under this section upon request and the payment of a reasonable fee not to exceed $1.00. The county clerk shall deposit any fee collected under this subsection in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. (18) This section does not prohibit the county clerk from making public and distributing to the public at no cost lists of individuals who are certified as qualified instructors as prescribed under section 5j. (19) A county clerk issuing an initial license or renewal license under this act shall mail the license to the licensee by first-class mail in a sealed envelope. Upon payment of the fee under subsection (15), a county clerk shall issue a replacement license in person at the time of application for a replacement license. A county clerk may also deliver a replacement license by first-class mail if the individual submits to the clerk a written request and a copy of the individual's state-issued driver license or personal identification card. (20) A county clerk, county sheriff, county prosecuting attorney, police department, or the department of state police is not liable for civil damages as a result of issuing a license under this act to an individual who later commits a crime or a negligent act. (21) An individual licensed under this act to carry a concealed pistol may voluntarily surrender that license without explanation. A county clerk shall retain a surrendered license as an official record for 1 year after the license is surrendered. If an individual voluntarily surrenders a license under this subsection, the county clerk shall notify the department of state police. The department of state police shall enter into the law enforcement information network that the license was voluntarily surrendered and the date the license was voluntarily surrendered. (22) As used in this section: (a) "Acceptable proof" means any of the following: (i) For a retired police officer or retired law enforcement officer, the officer's retired identification or a letter from a law enforcement agency stating that the retired police officer or law enforcement officer retired in good standing. (ii) For an individual who is employed or contracted by an entity described under section 5o(1) to provide security services, a letter from that entity stating that the employee is required by the employer or the terms of a contract to carry a concealed firearm on the premises of the employing or contracting entity and the individual's employee identification. (iii) For an individual who is licensed as a private investigator or private detective under the professional investigator licensure act, 1965 PA 285, MCL 338.821 to 338.851, the individual's license. (iv) For an individual who is a corrections officer of a county sheriff's department, the individual's employee identification and a letter stating that the individual has received county sheriff approved weapons training. (v) For an individual who is a retired corrections officer of a county sheriff's department, a letter from the county sheriff's office stating that the retired corrections officer retired in good standing and that the individual has received county sheriff approved weapons training. (vi) For an individual who is a motor carrier officer or capitol security officer of the department of state police, the individual's employee identification. (vii) For an individual who is a member of a sheriff's posse, the individual's identification. (viii) For an individual who is an auxiliary officer or reserve officer of a police or sheriff's department, the individual's employee identification. (ix) For an individual who is a parole, probation, or corrections officer, or absconder recovery unit member, of the department of corrections, the individual's employee identification and proof that the individual obtained a Michigan department of corrections weapons permit. (x) For an individual who is a retired parole, probation, or corrections officer, or retired absconder recovery unit member, of the department of corrections, a letter from the department of corrections stating that the retired parole, probation, or corrections officer, or retired absconder recovery unit member, retired in good standing and proof that the individual obtained a Michigan department of corrections weapons permit. (xi) For a state court judge or state court retired judge, a letter from the judicial tenure commission stating that the state court judge or state court retired judge is in good standing. (xii) For an individual who is a court officer, the individual's employee identification. (xiii) For a retired federal law enforcement officer, the identification required under 18 USC 926C or a letter from a law enforcement agency stating that the retired federal law enforcement officer retired in good standing. (xiv) For an individual who is a peace officer, the individual's employee identification. (b) "Convicted" means a final conviction, the payment of a fine, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere if accepted by the court, or a finding of guilt for a criminal law violation or a juvenile adjudication or disposition by the juvenile division of probate court or family division of circuit court for a violation that if committed by an adult would be a crime. (c) "Felony" means, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, that term as defined in section 1 of chapter I of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 761.1, or a violation of a law of the United States or another state that is designated as a felony or that is punishable by death or by imprisonment for more than 1 year. Felony does not include a violation of a penal law of this state that is expressly designated as a misdemeanor. (d) "Mental illness" means a substantial disorder of thought or mood that significantly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to cope with the ordinary demands of life, and includes, but is not limited to, clinical depression. (e) "Misdemeanor" means a violation of a penal law of this state or violation of a local ordinance substantially corresponding to a violation of a penal law of this state that is not a felony or a violation of an order, rule, or regulation of a state agency that is punishable by imprisonment or a fine that is not a civil fine, or both. (f) "Treatment" means care or any therapeutic service, including, but not limited to, the administration of a drug, and any other service for the treatment of a mental illness. Sec. 5l. (1) A license to carry a concealed pistol, including a renewal license, is valid until the applicant's date of birth that falls not less than 4 years or more than 5 years after the license is issued or renewed, as applicable. The county clerk that issued the license shall notify the licensee that his or her the licensee's concealed pistol license is about to expire and may be renewed as provided in this section. The notification must be sent by the county clerk to the last known address of the licensee as shown on the records of the county clerk. The notification must be sent in a sealed envelope by first-class mail not less than 3 months or more than 6 months before the expiration date of the current license. Except as provided in this section, a renewal of a license under section 5b must be issued in the same manner as an original license issued under section 5b. An applicant is eligible for a renewal of a license under this section if his or her the applicant's license is not expired, or expired within a 1-year period before the date of application under this section. Each applicant who submits an application for a renewal license to a county clerk under this section shall pay an application and licensing fee of $115.00 by any method of payment accepted by that county for payments of other fees and penalties. No other charge, fee, cost, or assessment, including any local charge, fee, cost, or assessment, is required of the applicant except as specifically authorized in this act. The applicant shall pay the application and licensing fee to the county. The county treasurer shall deposit $36.00 of each fee collected under this subsection in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. The county treasurer shall forward the balance remaining to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the balance of the fee in the general fund to the credit of the department of state police. (2) Subject to subsections (9) and (10), an application to renew a license to carry a concealed pistol may be submitted not more than 6 months before the expiration of the current license. No later than December 1, 2018, the The department of state police shall provide a system for an applicant to submit his or her an application to renew a license to carry a concealed pistol online or by first-class mail and shall accept those applications on behalf of the county clerk as required under this act at no additional charge. Each applicant who submits a renewal license online or by first-class mail to the department of state police under this section shall pay an application and licensing fee of $115.00 by any method of payment accepted by the department of state police. No other charge, fee, cost, or assessment is required of the applicant except as specifically authorized in this act. The applicant shall pay the application and licensing fee to the state. The state treasurer shall forward $36.00 of each fee collected under this subsection to the county treasurer who shall deposit the $36.00 in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. The state treasurer shall deposit the balance of the fee in the general fund to the credit of the department of state police. The department of state police shall notify the appropriate county clerk of the county in which the applicant resides of a properly submitted online application or application by first-class mail received by the department. If the county clerk issues a renewal license under this section, the county clerk shall send the license to the licensee by first-class mail in a sealed envelope. If the county clerk issues the renewal, the effective date of the renewal license is the date of expiration of the current license or the date of approval or issue of the renewal, whichever is later, and the date of expiration is the applicant's date of birth which is not less than 4 years or more than 5 years from the effective date of the license. (3) The department of state police shall complete the verification required under section 5b(6) and the county clerk shall issue a renewal license or a notice of statutory disqualification within 30 days after the date the renewal application was received. Beginning on the date the department of state police establishes a system under subsection (2), the department of state police shall provide an applicant a digital receipt, or a receipt by first-class mail if requested, for his or her the applicant's renewal application submitted online at the time the application is received by the department of state police. Beginning on the date the department of state police establishes a system under subsection (2), the department of state police shall mail an applicant a receipt by first-class mail for his or her the applicant's renewal application submitted by first-class mail at the time the application is received by the department of state police. The receipt issued under this subsection to an individual applying for a renewal license whose current license is not expired at the time of application must contain all of the following: (a) The name of the applicant. (b) The date and time the receipt is issued. (c) The amount paid. (d) The applicant's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number. (e) The statement "This receipt was issued for the purpose of renewal of a concealed pistol license. As provided in section 5l of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425l, this receipt shall serve as a concealed pistol license for the individual named in the receipt when carried with the expired license and is valid until a license or notice of statutory disqualification is issued by the county clerk. This receipt does not exempt the individual named in the receipt from complying with all applicable laws for the purchase of firearms.". (f) The name of the county in which the receipt is issued, if applicable. (g) An impression of the county seal, if applicable. (4) The receipt issued under subsection (3) to an individual applying for a renewal license whose license is expired must contain all of the following: (a) The name of the applicant. (b) The date and time the receipt is issued. (c) The amount paid. (d) The applicant's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number. (e) The statement "This receipt was issued for the purpose of renewal of a concealed pistol license. As provided in section 5l of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425l, if a license or notice of statutory disqualification is not issued within 30 days after the date this receipt was issued, this receipt shall serve as a concealed pistol license for the individual named in the receipt when carried with an official state-issued driver license or personal identification card. The receipt is valid as a license until a license or a notice of statutory disqualification is issued by the county clerk. This receipt does not exempt the individual named in the receipt from complying with all applicable laws for the purchase of firearms.". (5) Until November 30, 2018, a member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard who is on orders to a duty station outside of this state may submit his or her application to renew a license to carry a concealed pistol by first-class mail, containing the required fee, a notarized application, the licensee's address of record within the state, the licensee's orders to report to a duty station outside of this state, and if the licensee desires to have his or her application receipt, renewal license, or any other notices mailed to his or her address of assignment or deployment, a letter requesting that action including the address of assignment or deployment. If the county clerk issues a renewal license under this section, the county clerk shall send the license to the licensee by first-class mail in a sealed envelope. If the licensee is a member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard who is on orders to a duty station outside of this state and requests that his or her license be sent to the address of assignment or deployment, the county clerk shall mail the license to the licensee at the address of assignment or deployment provided in the renewal application. Until November 30, 2018, if a renewal application is submitted by a member of the United States Armed Forces, the United States Armed Forces Reserve, or the Michigan National Guard who is on orders to a duty station outside of this state, the county clerk shall mail a receipt to the licensee by first-class mail. (5) (6) If an individual applies for a renewal license before the expiration of his or her the individual's license, the expiration date of the current license is extended until the renewal license or notice of statutory disqualification is issued. The county clerk shall notify the department of state police in a manner prescribed by the department of state police after he or she the county clerk receives an application for renewal. The department of state police shall immediately enter into the law enforcement information network the date that application for renewal was submitted and that the renewal application is pending. (6) (7) A person An individual carrying a concealed pistol after the expiration date of his or her the individual's license under an extension under subsection (6) (5) shall keep the receipt issued by the county clerk under subsection (3) and his or her the individual's expired license in his or her the individual's possession at all times that he or she the individual is carrying the pistol. For the purposes of this act, the receipt is considered to be part of the license to carry a concealed pistol until a renewal license is issued or denied or a notice of statutory disqualification is issued. (7) (8) The educational requirements under section 5b(7)(c) are waived for an applicant who is a retired police officer or retired law enforcement officer. (8) (9) The educational requirements under section 5b(7)(c) for an applicant who is applying for a renewal of a license under this act are waived except that the applicant shall certify that he or she the applicant has completed at least 3 hours' review of the training described under section 5b(7)(c) and has had at least 1 hour of firing range time in the 6 months immediately preceding the subsequent application. The educational and firing range requirements of this subsection are met if the applicant certifies on the renewal application form that he or she the applicant has complied with the requirements of this subsection. An applicant is not required to verify the statements made under this subsection and is not required to obtain a certificate or undergo training other than as required by this subsection. (9) (10) An applicant who is applying for a renewal of a license issued under section 5b is not required to have fingerprints taken again under section 5b(9) if all of the following conditions have been met: (a) There has been established a system for the department of state police to save and maintain in its automated fingerprint identification system (AFIS) database all fingerprints that are submitted to the department of state police under section 5b. (b) The applicant's fingerprints have been submitted to and maintained by the department of state police as described in subdivision (a) for ongoing comparison with the automated fingerprint identification system (AFIS) database.